apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x641;&#x631;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرمود</l>
          <r>فرمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرموده</l>
          <r>فرمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرمای</l>
          <r>فرمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرمای</l>
          <r>فرمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرمای</l>
          <r>فرمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرمای</l>
          <r>فرمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x641;&#x631;&#x63A;&#x627;&#x631;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرغارید</l>
          <r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرغاریده</l>
          <r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرغار</l>
          <r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرغار</l>
          <r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرغار</l>
          <r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرغار</l>
          <r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x641;&#x631;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x627;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرستاد</l>
          <r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرستاده</l>
          <r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرست</l>
          <r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرست</l>
          <r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرست</l>
          <r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>فرست</l>
          <r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x634;&#x6A9;&#x633;&#x62A;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شکست</l>
          <r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شکسته</l>
          <r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شکن</l>
          <r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شکن</l>
          <r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شکن</l>
          <r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شکن</l>
          <r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x634;&#x646;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شنید</l>
          <r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شنیده</l>
          <r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شنو</l>
          <r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شنو</l>
          <r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شنو</l>
          <r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>شنو</l>
          <r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="&#x634;&#x6A9;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x634;&#x6A9;&#x633;&#x62A;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x634;&#x646;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x634;&#x646;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x641;&#x631;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x627;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x641;&#x631;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x627;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x641;&#x631;&#x63A;&#x627;&#x631;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x641;&#x631;&#x63A;&#x627;&#x631;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x641;&#x631;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x641;&#x631;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;"/></e>
